Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 3. Charitable Trust Election.

Sec. 13.38.440.
Charitable trust election.

The trustee of a trust held exclusively for charitable purposes may elect to be governed by AS

13.38.440

—

13.38.490

unless the governing instrument expressly provides that the election provided by AS

13.38.440

—

13.38.490

is not available.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.450.
Requirements for making election.

To make an election under AS

13.38.440

—

13.38.490

, the trustee shall adopt and follow an investment policy seeking a total return for the investments held by the trust, whether the return is to be derived from appreciation of capital or earnings and distributions with respect to capital or both. The policy constituting the election must be in writing, must be maintained as part of the permanent records of the trust, and must recite that it constitutes an election to be governed by AS

13.38.440

—

13.38.490

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.460.
Selection of percentage after charitable trust election.

After a trustee has elected under AS

13.38.440

for the trust to be governed by AS

13.38.440

—

13.38.490

, the trustee shall, in a writing maintained as part of the permanent records of the trust, select the percentage of the value of the trust that will be considered income and determine that it is consistent with the long-term preservation of the real value of the principal of the trust, but the percentage may not be less than two percent or more than seven percent each year of the principal value of the trust. The trustee may elect to change a percentage whenever the trustee determines that the new percentage is necessary and prudent.

For a charitable trust required by 26 U.S.C. 4942 (Internal Revenue Code) to distribute a higher amount than the percentage selected under (a) of this section, the amount required by 26 U.S.C. 4942 (Internal Revenue Code) controls over the percentage selected.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003; am § 12 ch 7 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.38.470.
Revocation of charitable trust election.

The trustee may revoke an election to be governed by AS

13.38.440

—

13.38.490

if the revocation is made as part of an alternative investment policy seeking the long-term preservation of the real value of the principal of the trust. The revocation and alternative investment policy must be in writing and maintained as part of the permanent records of the trust.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.480.
Value determination.

For the purposes of applying AS

13.38.440

—

13.38.490

, the value of the trust is the fair market value of the cash and other assets held by the trustee with respect to the trust, whether these assets would be considered income or principal under the other provisions of this chapter, determined at least annually. In the discretion of the trustee, the value of the trust may be averaged over a period of three or more preceding years, except that, if the trust has been in existence less than three years and the trustee decides to average the value, the average shall be determined over the period during which the trust has been in existence.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003; am § 13 ch 7 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.38.490.
Definitions.

In AS

13.38.440

—

13.38.490

, except as otherwise expressly stated in AS

13.38.440

—

13.38.490

,

“income” means the percentage of the value of the trust computed under AS

13.38.440

—

13.38.490

;

“principal” means all assets other than those identified as income in (1) of this section that are held by the trustee with respect to the trust.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)